Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.411

Enforcement under Hague Convention.

Under this article a court of this state may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if it were a child custody determination.

[ 2001 c 65 s 302.]